Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.2 Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank
46-12.2-4.3.
Establishment of the clean energy fund.

There is hereby authorized and created within the Rhode Island infrastructure bank a clean energy fund for the purpose of providing technical, administrative, and financial assistance to a local governmental unit, corporation, or person for energy efficient, renewable energy, and demand-side management projects. The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall review and approve all applications for projects to be financed through the clean energy fund.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section, which may include, without limitation, forms for financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments and establishing the process through which a local governmental unit, corporation, or person may submit an application for financial assistance from the clean energy fund. All rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section including, without limiting the generality of the preceding statement, the authority:

To receive and disburse funds as may be available for the purpose of the fund subject to the provisions of this section;

To make and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to eligible borrowers from amounts on deposit in the fund;

To levy administrative fees on eligible borrowers as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section, provided the fees have been previously authorized by an agreement between the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and the eligible borrower;

To engage the services of third-party vendors to provide professional services;

To establish one or more accounts within the fund; and

Such other authority as granted to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under this chapter.

Subject to the provisions of this section and to any agreements with the holders of any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank for the account of the fund shall be applied by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, to the following purposes:

To provide financial assistance to local governmental units, corporations, or persons to finance costs of approved projects, as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, and to refinance the costs of the projects, subject to terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank;

To fund reserves for bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and to purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance, and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for, obligations of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in this chapter;

To pay expenses of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank in administering the clean energy fund;

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, amounts payable by borrowers on loans and obligations outstanding in the event of default thereof; amounts in any account in the fund may be applied to defaults on loans outstanding to the borrower for which the account was established and, on a parity basis with all other accounts, to defaults on any loans or obligations outstanding; and

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in this chapter, any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

In addition to other remedies of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under any loan agreement or otherwise provided by law, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank may also recover from a borrower, in an action in superior court, any amount due the Rhode Island infrastructure bank together with any other actual damages the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have sustained from the failure or refusal of the borrower to make the payments or abide by the terms of the loan agreement.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank may create one or more loan loss reserve funds to serve as further security for any loans made by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank issued to fund projects in accordance with this section.

To the extent possible, and in accordance with law, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall encourage the use of project labor agreements for projects by local governmental units over ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and local hiring on projects funded under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 223, § 3, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 224, § 3, effective July 8, 2021.

46-12.2-5.
Officers.

An executive director, who shall be a person professionally skilled and experienced in law, finance, or public administration, shall be appointed by the board of directors as chief executive officer of the agency, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The executive director shall administer the affairs of the agency, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing matters, relating to contracting, financial assistance administration, personnel and administration, under the supervision of the board in accordance with such authorizations as the board may from time to time reasonably adopt and continue in force. Salaries of personnel shall be guided by the unclassified pay plan. The board may also appoint persons to hold the offices of secretary and treasurer to the agency, including assistant secretaries and assistant treasurers in whom may be vested any of the powers of the secretary and the treasurer, respectively, or may appoint a director or employee of the agency to exercise such duties. The secretary shall be the custodian of the seal and of the books and records of the agency, and shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board of directors. The secretary may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the agency, and may give certificates under its official seal to the effect that the copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the agency may rely upon the certificates. The treasurer shall have charge of the books of account and accounting records of the agency, and shall be responsible, under the supervision of the executive director, for financial control for the agency. The board shall appoint and establish compensation benefits and other terms of employment for other officers and employees of the agency as it deems reasonable and necessary. Officers of the agency shall serve at the pleasure of the board or under contracts of employment; provided, however, that no contract of employment shall exceed a term of three (3) years, which may be renewed upon the expiration for successive terms.

Present or past directors, officers, employees, or agents of the agency may be indemnified by the agency to the extent allowed by and in accordance with the indemnification provisions applicable to nonprofit corporations pursuant to §

7-6-6

, as amended from time to time. The agency shall be a public body for purposes of §

9-1-31.1

.

The agency shall be subject to the provisions of §

42-11.3-1

and the executive director shall not be deemed to be a director as used in said section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2.

46-12.2-5.1.
Purchasing.

Internal purchasing procedures of the agency shall follow the principles and policies of state purchasing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2.

46-12.2-6.
Establishment of the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund and the local interest subsidy trust fund — Sources of funds — Permitted uses.

The agency shall be the instrumentality of the state for administration of the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, and the local interest subsidy trust fund, and such other funds it holds or for which it is responsible, and, in conjunction with the department, is empowered to and shall take all action necessary or appropriate to secure to the state the benefits of title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., and other federal or state legislation pertaining to the funds and to the financing of approved projects. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and other powers of the agency provided in this chapter, the agency is empowered to and shall:

Cooperate with appropriate federal agencies in all matters related to administration of the water pollution control revolving fund and, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, administer the fund and receive and disburse such funds from any such agencies and from the state as may be available for the purpose of the fund.

Administer the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund and the local interest subsidy trust fund, and receive and disburse such funds from the state as may be available for the purpose of the funds subject to the provisions of this chapter.

In cooperation with the department, prepare, and submit to appropriate federal agencies applications for capitalization grants under title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., and enter into capitalization grant agreements, operating agreements, and other agreements with appropriate federal and state agencies, and accept and disburse, as provided herein, any capitalization grant awards made under title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

Cooperate with the department in the preparation and submission to appropriate federal and state agencies of intended use plans identifying the use of capitalization grant awards and other moneys in the water pollution control revolving fund.

In cooperation with the department, prepare and submit to appropriate federal agencies, the department and the governor, annual and other reports and audits required by law.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter both to make, and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to local governmental units, persons or corporations from amounts on deposit in the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund and from other funds of the agency; and to provide, and enter into binding commitments to provide subsidy assistance for loans, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations from amounts on deposit in the local interest subsidy trust fund.

Establish and maintain fiscal controls and accounting procedures conforming to generally accepted government accounting standards sufficient to ensure proper accounting for receipts in and disbursements from the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, the local interest subsidy trust fund and other funds it holds or for which it is responsible and, adopt such rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines which it deems necessary to ensure that local governmental units, persons and corporations administer and maintain approved project accounts and other funds and accounts relating to financial assistance in accordance with generally accepted government accounting standards.

The agency shall establish and set up on its books a special fund, designated the water pollution control revolving fund, to be held in trust and to be administered by the agency solely as provided in this chapter and in any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency. The agency shall credit to the water pollution control revolving fund or one or more accounts therein:

All federal capitalization grant awards received under title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., provided the agency shall transfer to the department the amount allowed by § 603(d)(7) of the Water Quality Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1383(d)(7), to defray administration expenses;

All amounts appropriated or designated to the agency by the state for purposes of the fund;

To the extent required by federal law, loan repayments and other payments received by the agency on any loans, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations;

All investment earnings on amounts credited to the fund to the extent required by federal law;

All proceeds of bonds of the agency to the extent required by any trust agreement for such bonds;

All other monies which are specifically designated for this fund, including, amounts from the Rhode Island Clean Water Act environmental trust fund, gifts, bequests, administrative, civil and criminal penalties, or other funds from any public or private sources; and

Any other amounts required by the provisions of this chapter, agreement, or any other law or by any trust agreement pertaining to bonds to be credited to the fund or which the agency in its discretion shall determine to credit thereto.

At the request of the governor, the agency shall take all action necessary to transfer the state’s allotment under title II of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1281 et seq., for federal fiscal year 1989 and each federal fiscal year thereafter, to the purposes of the water pollution control revolving fund, provided that any portion of any allotment which, under the provisions of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., may not be transferred to or used for the purposes of the water pollution control revolving fund, shall continue to be received and administered by the department as provided by law.

The agency shall establish and set up on its books a special fund, designated the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, to be held in trust and to be administered by the agency solely as provided in this chapter and in any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency. The agency shall credit to the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund or one or more accounts therein:

All amounts appropriated or designated to the agency by the state for purposes of the fund;

At its discretion, and to the extent allowed by law, loan repayments and other payments received by the agency on any loans, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations;

At its discretion, all investment earnings and amounts credited to the fund;

All proceeds of bonds of the agency to the extent required by any trust agreement for such bonds;

All other monies which are specifically designated for this fund, including, amounts from the Rhode Island Clean Water Act environmental trust fund, gifts, bequests, administrative, civil and criminal penalties, or other funds from any public or private sources; and

Any other amounts required by provisions of this chapter or agreement, or any other law or any trust agreement pertaining to bonds to be credited to the fund or which the agency in its discretion shall determine to credit thereto.

Except to the extent limited by federal law, and subject to the provisions of this chapter, to the provisions of any agreement with the state authorized by §

46-12.2-7

, and to any agreements with the holders of any bonds of the agency or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the agency for the account of either the water pollution control revolving fund or the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund shall be applied by the agency, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the agency or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the agency, to the following purposes:

To provide financial assistance to a local governmental unit or corporation to finance costs of approved projects, and to refinance the costs of the projects, subject to such terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the department and/or the agency in accordance with §

46-12.2-8

;

To purchase or refinance debt obligations of a local governmental unit or corporation, or to provide guarantees, insurance or similar forms of financial assistance for the obligations;

To fund reserves for bonds of the agency and to purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance, and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in §

46-12.2-14

, bonds of the agency issued in accordance with this chapter; and

To pay expenses of the agency and the department in administering the funds and the financial assistance programs of the agency authorized by this chapter. As part of the annual appropriations bill, the department shall set forth the gross amount of expenses received from the agency and a complete, specific breakdown of the sums retained and/or expended for administrative expenses.

By way of illustration, not by limitation, in the personnel area, the breakdown of administrative expenses should contain the number of personnel paid, the position numbers of the personnel, and whether or not the position is a new position or a position which had been funded previously by federal funds or a position which had been previously created but unfunded.

The agency shall also establish and set up on its books a special fund, designated the local interest subsidy trust fund, to be held in trust and to be administered by the agency solely as provided in this chapter and in any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency. The agency may maintain a separate account in the local interest subsidy trust fund for each local governmental unit or corporation which has received a loan from the agency, in accordance with this chapter, to separately account for or otherwise segregate all or any part of the amounts credited to the fund and receipts in and disbursements from the fund. To the extent that the agency is required by this chapter, by any loan agreement or by any trust agreement, it shall, and, to the extent that it is permitted, it may in its discretion, credit to the local interest subsidy trust fund, and to one or more of the accounts or subaccounts therein:

All amounts appropriated or designated to the agency by the state for purposes of the fund;

Loan repayments and other payments received on loans, local governmental obligations, and non-governmental obligations;

Investment earnings on amounts credited to the local interest subsidy trust fund;

Proceeds of agency bonds;

All other monies which are specifically designated for this fund including, amounts from the Rhode Island Clean Water Act environmental trust fund, gifts, bequests, administrative, civil and criminal penalties, or other funds from any public or private sources; and

Any other amounts permitted by law.

Subject to any agreement with the state authorized by §

46-12.2-7

, to the provisions of §

46-12.2-8

, and to any agreement with the holders of any bonds of the agency or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the agency for the account of the local interest subsidy trust fund shall be applied by the agency, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the agency or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the agency, to the following purposes:

To pay or provide for all or a portion of the interest otherwise payable by local governmental units, persons or corporations on loans, local governmental obligations, and non-governmental obligations, in the amounts and on terms determined by the agency in accordance with §

46-12.2-8

;

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, amounts payable by local governmental units, persons or corporations on loans, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations outstanding in the event of default thereof; amounts in any account in the local interest subsidy trust fund may be applied to defaults on loans outstanding to the local governmental unit, person or corporation for which the account was established and, on a parity basis with all other accounts, to defaults on any loans, local governmental obligations, or non-governmental obligations outstanding; and

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in §

46-12.2-14

, any bonds of the agency.

Subject to any express limitation of this chapter pertaining to expenditure or disbursement of funds or accounts held by the agency, funds or accounts held by the agency may be transferred to any other fund or account held by the agency and expended or disbursed for purposes permitted by the fund or account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-7.
Payment of state funds — Agreement between agency and department.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, upon the written request of the agency, the state general treasurer shall pay to the agency, from time to time, from the proceeds of any bonds or notes issued by the state for the purposes of this chapter or funds otherwise lawfully payable to the agency for the purposes of this chapter, amounts equal to twenty percent (20%) of each federal capitalization grant award received or expected to be received by the agency under title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., plus such other amounts as shall have been appropriated or lawfully designated. All amounts so paid to the agency shall be credited to the water pollution control revolving fund to be applied as provided in §

46-12.2-6

.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d), upon the written request of the agency, the state general treasurer shall pay to the agency, from time to time, from the proceeds of any bonds or notes issued by the state for the purposes of this chapter or funds otherwise lawfully payable to the agency for the purposes of this chapter, such amounts as shall have been appropriated or lawfully designated to meet the requirements of the local interest subsidy trust fund. All amounts so paid shall be in addition to any other amounts credited or expected to be credited to such fund, and shall be credited to the local interest subsidy trust fund.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d), upon the written request of the agency, the state general treasurer shall pay to the agency, from time to time, from the proceeds of any bonds or notes issued by the state for the purposes of this chapter or funds otherwise lawfully payable to the agency for the purposes of this chapter, such amounts as shall have been appropriated or lawfully designated for the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund. All amounts so paid to the agency shall be credited to the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund.

The director of the department and the governor shall enter into, execute, and deliver one or more agreements with the agency setting forth or otherwise determining the terms, conditions, and procedures for, and the amount, time, and manner of payment of, all amounts available from the state to the agency under this section. The agreement or agreements may include such covenants and undertakings of the state, the agency, and the department as the governor, the agency, and the director of the department deem reasonable, including, without limitation, provision for payments by the state in advance of receipt of federal capitalization grant awards, or the execution and delivery of loan agreements by the agency and covenants and undertakings by the state to make payments in the future of amounts appropriated by the state when required by the agency or by the provisions of any trust agreement securing bonds. The agreement or agreements may also include provisions consistent with this chapter governing the application by the agency of amounts appropriated or designated by the state to the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, and the local interest subsidy trust fund and the remedies of the agency provided in §

46-12.2-8(h)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2.

46-12.2-8.
Procedures for application, approval, and award of financial assistance.

Any local governmental unit, person or corporation may apply to the agency for financial assistance in accordance with this chapter to finance all or any part of the cost of a water pollution abatement project. The agency shall not award financial assistance to a local governmental unit, person or corporation until and unless the department shall have issued a certificate of approval of the project or portion thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for water pollution abatement projects funded outside of the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, or the local interest subsidy trust fund, the agency may provide financial assistance without the requirement of the issuance of a certificate of approval, and such projects shall not be required to be listed on the department’s priority list as set forth in this chapter.

If the department shall determine, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, that an application for financial assistance or portion thereof shall be approved, it shall deliver to the agency a certificate of approval of the project or a portion thereof which shall specify the project or portion thereof eligible for financial assistance and such other terms, conditions and limitations with respect to the construction and operation of the project as the department shall determine. The agency shall specify, among other things, the type and amount of financial assistance to be provided, the costs thereof eligible for financial assistance, the amounts, if any, of the financial assistance, to be provided from the water pollution control revolving fund and/or the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, the amount, if any, of subsidy assistance to be granted from the local interest subsidy trust fund, the amount, if any, of other financial assistance permitted by this chapter to be provided, and such other terms, conditions, and limitations on the financial assistance, the expenditure of loan proceeds, and the construction and operation of the project as the agency shall determine or approve.

Any water pollution abatement project or portion thereof included on the priority list established by the department for federal fiscal year 1989 or any federal fiscal year thereafter shall be eligible for financial assistance in accordance with this chapter.

In addition to the authority provided by law, the department shall be responsible for, and shall have all requisite power to, review and approve reports and plans for water pollution abatement projects and approved projects, or any part thereof, for which financial assistance has been applied or granted in accordance with this chapter, to enter into contracts with local governmental units, persons or corporations relative to approved projects, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the costs of approved projects eligible for financial assistance, grants, and other terms, conditions and limitations with respect to the construction and operation of the project, and to inspect the construction and operation thereof of projects in compliance with approved plans. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in connection with the exercise of its powers and performance of its duties under this chapter, the department shall have all the powers provided by law to the department and its director. The department shall adopt rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines to carry out the purposes of this chapter and for the proper administration of its powers and duties under this chapter. The rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines shall include among other things, criteria for determining those water pollution abatement projects to be approved for financial assistance (the criteria shall include the priority determination system), specification of eligible costs of the projects, and provisions for compliance by projects constructed in whole or in part with funds directly made available under this chapter by federal capitalization grants with the requirements of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1351 et seq., and other federal laws applicable to the project. The department shall cooperate with the agency in the development of capitalization grant applications, operating plans, and intended use plans for federal capitalization grant awards under title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., and may enter into such agreements and other undertakings with the agency and federal agencies as necessary to secure to the state the benefits of title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq. In order to provide for the expenses of the department under this chapter, the agency shall transfer to the department for application to the expenses an amount from the water pollution control revolving fund equal to the maximum amount authorized by federal law, and such additional amounts as may be needed from the Rhode Island water pollution control fund and from any other monies available. The agency and the department shall enter into an operating agreement and amend the same, from time to time, allocating their respective rights, duties, and obligations with respect to the award of financial assistance and grants to finance approved projects under this chapter and establishing procedures for the application, approval, and oversight of projects, financial assistance, and grants.

Upon issuance of a certificate of approval, the agency shall award as soon as practicable the financial assistance to the local governmental unit, person or corporation for any approved project specified in the certificate; provided, however, the agency may decline to award any financial assistance which the agency determines will have a substantial adverse effect on the interests of holders of bonds or other indebtedness of the agency or the interests of other participants in the financial assistance program, or for good and sufficient cause affecting the finances of the agency. All financial assistance shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the agency and the local governmental unit, person or corporation, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer, according to the terms and conditions of the certificate of approval and such other terms and conditions as may be established by the agency, and each loan shall be evidenced and secured by the issue to the agency of local governmental obligations or non-governmental obligations in fully marketable form in principal amount, bearing interest at the rate or rates specified in the applicable loan agreement, and shall otherwise bear such terms and conditions as authorized by this chapter and the loan agreement.

The agency shall adopt rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines for the proper administration of its financial assistance programs and the provision of financial assistance under this chapter. The rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines shall be consistent with the requirements of title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., and any rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines adopted by the department, and may include, without limitation, forms of financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments, and provision for submission to the agency and the department by a local governmental unit, person or corporation of the information regarding the proposed water pollution abatement project, the wastewater system of which it is a part, and the local governmental unit or corporation as the agency or the department shall deem necessary, to determine the eligibility of a project for financial assistance under this chapter, the financial feasibility of a project, and the sufficiency of general revenues or wastewater system revenues to secure and pay the loan and the local governmental obligations or non-governmental obligations issued to evidence the project. The agency shall, no later than December 31, 2015, enter into an agreement with the Rhode Island commerce corporation to ensure collaboration for brownfields and energy efficiency related projects to which the agency provides financial assistance to corporations.

Subject to the provisions of any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency, when the agency shall have awarded a loan eligible for subsidy assistance from funds held by the agency for the credit of the local interest subsidy trust fund, the agency shall credit to the applicable account in the fund maintained in accordance with §

46-12.2-6(e)

, the amount, if any, as provided in the loan agreement to defray all or a portion of the interest otherwise payable by the local governmental unit, person or corporation on the loan.

In addition to other remedies of the agency under any loan agreement or otherwise provided by law, the agency may also recover from a local governmental unit, person or corporation, in an action in superior court, any amount due the agency together with any other actual damages the agency shall have sustained from the failure or refusal of the local governmental unit or corporation to make the payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-9.
Authorization to expend funds available for local grants.

In addition to the financial assistance provided by the agency to local governmental units, persons or corporations for approved projects in accordance with this chapter, the department is hereby authorized to expend funds otherwise available for grants to local governmental units, persons or corporations to the extent permitted by federal and state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.